District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.05e

False statements.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement in an application, record, report, plan, or other document submitted or maintained under this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and subject to a fine not to exceed $10,000, imprisonment not to exceed 6 months, or both. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 5e
as added Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 101(b), 61 DCR 6767